Hawaii statutes.
[§286-108.4 Driver education and
behind-the-wheel driver training program.] The director of transportation
is directed to establish and certify a statewide driver education program and
behind-the-wheel driver training program, to include the number of course
hours, curriculum, and certification of teachers and third-party examiners.
The director of transportation is also directed to set a cost for the programs
to enable the programs to be self-sufficient. The director of transportation
shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this
[section]. [L 1999, c 175, §4]

Revision Note

Section codified pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next